src/nynorsk-nob-lex.txt
LEXICON Prnyn
+Pr: # ;

LEXICON Advnyn
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Anyn
+A: # ;

LEXICON Pronnyn
+Pron: # ;

LEXICON Nynorsk

fra:frå Prnyn ;
uten:utan Prnyn ;
hos:hjå Prnyn ;

ikke:ikkje Advnyn ;
også:òg Advnyn ;
da:då Advnyn ;
mer:meir Advnyn ;
mye:mykje Advnyn ;
bare:berre Advnyn ;
noe:noko Advnyn ;
sammen:saman Advnyn ;
selv:sjølv Advnyn ;
selv:sjølve Advnyn ;
hvor:kor Advnyn ;
hvor:kvar Advnyn ;
ellers:elles Advnyn ;
enda:enno Advnyn ;
nå:no Advnyn ;

flere:fleire Anyn ;
egen:eigen Anyn ;
god:betre Anyn ;
gammel:gammal Anyn ;

jeg:eg Pronnyn ;
dere:dykk Pronnyn ;
